test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-manitswma60_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - manitsõma1: # Verb (60) manitsõma1 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     manitsõma+V+Inf/mA: manitsõma
     manitsõma+V+Inf: manitsaq
     manitsõma+V+ActPrtPrc: manitsnuq
     manitsõma+V+PssPrtPrc: manitsõt
     manitsõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: manidsõ
     manitsõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: manitsõs
     manitsõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: manidsi
     manitsõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: manitsʼ
